Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2315
Prosecuting attorney, defined.

For purposes of sections 29-2315.01 to 29-2325, prosecuting attorney means a county attorney, city attorney, or designated attorney.

Laws 2003, LB 17, § 10.